Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part VI Enforcement and Civil Liability

7-11-601.
Investigations — Subpoena power.

The director may make any investigation, within or without this state, as the director finds necessary to determine whether a person has violated, or is about to violate, this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter or to aid in enforcement of this chapter.

Except as provided in §

7-11-703(c)

, the director may publish information concerning a violation of this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter or concerning types of securities or acts or practices in the offer, sale, or purchase of types of securities which may operate as a fraud or deceit.

For purposes of an investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the director or an officer or employee designated by the director may by rule or order administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production, by subpoena or otherwise, of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, other documents, and records which the director determines to be relevant and material to the investigation or proceeding.

The director may require or permit a person to file a statement, under oath or otherwise as the director determines, as to the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated.

The director may issue and apply to enforce a subpoena in this state at the request of a securities agency or administrator of another state if the activities constituting an alleged violation for which the information is sought would be in violation of this chapter if the activities had occurred in this state.

If a person does not testify or produce the documents required by the director or a designated officer or employee pursuant to subpoena, the director or designated employee may apply to the court for an order compelling compliance.

A request for an order of compliance may be addressed to either:

The superior court if the person is subject to a service of process in this state; or

A court of another state able to assert jurisdiction over the person refusing to testify or produce, if the person is not subject to service of process in this state.

Not later than the time the director requests an order for compliance, the director shall either send notice of the request by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the respondent at the last known address or take other steps that are reasonably calculated to give the respondent actual notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 69, § 1.

7-11-602.
Enforcement.

If the director reasonably believes, whether or not based upon an investigation conducted under §

7-11-601

, that any person has engaged, is engaging, or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or order under this chapter, the director, in addition to any specific power granted under this chapter and subject to compliance with the requirements of §

7-11-712

, may issue, without a prior hearing, an order against the person or persons engaged in the prohibited activities, directing them to desist and refrain from further illegal activity. The cease and desist order shall state the section of this chapter or rule or order of the director under this chapter that the director reasonably believes has been or is being violated.

If the director reasonably believes, whether or not based on an investigation conducted under §

7-11-601

, that a person has violated this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter, the director may, in addition to any specific power granted under this chapter, after notice and hearing in an administrative proceeding unless the right to notice and hearing is waived by the person against whom the sanction is imposed:

Issue a cease and desist order against the person;

Censure the person if the person is a licensed broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative;

Bar or suspend the person from association with a licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser in this state; and

Issue an order against an applicant, licensed person, or other person who violates this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter, imposing a civil penalty up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a single violation.

For purposes of determining what sanctions, if any, to be imposed under subsections (b)(1) through (b)(4) of this section, the director shall consider, among other factors, the frequency and persistence of the conduct constituting a violation of this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter, the number of persons adversely affected by the conduct, and the resources of the person committing the violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 69, § 1.

7-11-603.
Power of court to grant relief.

Upon a showing by the director that a person has violated or is about to violate this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter, the superior court may grant or impose one or more of the following appropriate legal or equitable remedies:

Upon a showing of a violation of this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter:

A temporary restraining order, permanent or temporary prohibitory or mandatory injunction, or a writ of prohibition or mandamus;

A civil penalty up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a single violation or of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for multiple violations in a single proceeding or a series of related proceedings;

A declaratory judgment;

Restitution to investors;

The appointment of a receiver or conservator for the defendant or the defendant’s assets; and

Other relief as the court deems just.

Upon a showing that the defendant is about to violate this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter only:

A temporary restraining order;

A temporary or permanent injunction; or

A writ of prohibition or mandamus.

In determining the appropriate relief to grant, the court shall consider enforcement actions taken and sanctions imposed by the director under §

7-11-602

in connection with the transactions constituting violations of this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter.

The director is not required to post a bond in an action under this section.

Upon a showing by the securities agency or administrator of another state that a person has violated the securities act of that state or a rule or order of the securities agency or administrator of that state, the court, in addition to any other legal or equitable remedies may impose one or more of the following remedies:

Appointment of a receiver, conservator, or ancillary receiver or conservator for the defendant or the defendant’s assets located in this state; and

Other relief as the court deems just.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-604.
Criminal penalties.

A person who willfully violates a provision of this chapter, except §

7-11-504

, or a rule of the director under this chapter, or who violates §

7-11-504

, knowing the statement made or omitted to be false or misleading in any material respect, is guilty of a felony and upon conviction is fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisoned not more than ten (10) years, or both.

A person who willfully violates a stop order or a cease and desist order issued by the director under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and is fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

A person convicted of violating a rule or order under this chapter may be fined as stated in subsection (b), but may not be imprisoned, if the person proves lack of knowledge of the rule or order.

No indictment or information may be brought under this section more than ten (10) years after the alleged violation.

The director may refer evidence concerning violations of this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter to the attorney general who may, with or without a reference, institute appropriate criminal proceedings under this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter limits the power of this state to punish a person for conduct constituting a crime under other law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 266, § 3.

7-11-605.
Civil liability.

A person who offers or sells a security in violation of §

7-11-201

,

7-11-301(1)

or (2),

7-11-305(k)

,

7-11-501

,

7-11-503

, or

7-11-505(b)

is liable to the purchaser of the security from that person. Upon tender of the security, the purchaser may recover the consideration paid for the security and interest at the legal rate of this state from the date of payment, costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court, less the amount of income received on the security. Tender requires only notice of willingness to exchange the security for the amount specified. If that purchaser no longer owns the security, the purchaser may recover damages. Damages are the amount that would be recoverable upon a tender less the value of the security when the purchaser disposed of it, plus interest at the legal rate of this state from the date of disposition of the security, costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court.

A person who offers or sells a security in violation of §

7-11-501

or

7-11-503

is not liable under subsection (a) if:

The purchaser knew of the untrue statement of a material fact or omission of a statement of a material fact; or

The seller did not know and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known of the untrue statement or misleading omission.

A person who willfully participates in an act or transaction in violation of §

7-11-502

is liable to a person who purchases or sells a security, other than a security traded on a national securities exchange or quoted on a national automated quotation system administered by a self regulatory organization, at a price that was affected by the act or transaction for the damages sustained as a result of the act or transaction. Damages are the amount that would be recoverable upon a tender less the value of the security when the purchaser or seller disposed of it, plus interest at the legal rate of this state from the date of disposition of the security, costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court.

A person who directly or indirectly controls another person who is liable under subsection (a) or (c), a partner, officer, or director of the person liable, a person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, an employee of the person liable if the employee materially aids in the act, omission or transaction constituting the violation, and a broker-dealer or sales representative who materially aids in the act, omission, or transaction constituting the violation, are also liable jointly and severally with and to the same extent as the other person, but it is a defense that the person did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of the facts by which the liability is alleged to exist. Regarding a person who, directly or indirectly, controls another person who is liable under subsection (c) of this section, it is also a defense that the controlling person acted in good faith and did not, directly or indirectly, induce the act, omission, or transaction constituting the violation. Contribution among the several persons liable is the same as in cases arising out of breach of contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1.

7-11-606.
Civil statute of limitations.

No person may obtain relief under §

7-11-605

unless suit is brought within the earliest of one year after the discovery of the violation, one year after discovery should have been made by the exercise of reasonable care, or three (3) years after the act, omission, or transaction constituting the violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-607.
Rescission and settlement offers.

No purchaser may obtain relief under §

7-11-605(a)

if, before suit is commenced, the purchaser:

Receives a written offer:

Stating the respect in which liability under §

7-11-605

may have arisen and fairly advising the purchaser of the purchaser’s rights of rescission;

If the basis for relief under §

7-11-605(a)

is a violation of §

7-11-501

or

7-11-503

of this chapter, including financial and other information necessary to correct all material misstatements or omissions in the information that was required by this chapter to be furnished to the purchaser as of the time of the sale of the security to the purchaser;

Offering to repurchase the security for cash, payable on delivery of the security, equal to the consideration paid, plus interest at the legal rate of this state from the date of payment, less income received on the security, or, if the purchaser no longer owns the security, offering to pay the purchaser upon acceptance of the offer an amount in cash equal to the damages computed under §

7-11-605

(a); and

Stating that the offer may be accepted by the purchaser within thirty (30) days after the date of its receipt by the purchaser or any shorter period, not less than three (3) days, the director, by order, prescribes; and

Fails to accept the offer, in writing, within the period specified under subsection (a)(1)(iv).

The director may prescribe by rule the form in which the information specified in subsection (a) must be contained in an offer made under subsection (a).

An offer under subsection (a) must be delivered to the offeree or sent in a manner that assures actual receipt by the offeree.

If, after acceptance, a rescission offer is not performed in accordance with either its terms or this section, the offeree may obtain relief under §

7-11-605

without regard to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-608.
General liability provisions.

Except as provided in §

7-11-607

, a tender required under this chapter may be made before entry of judgment.

The rights and remedies provided by this chapter are in addition to any other rights or remedies that exist at law or in equity, but this chapter does not create any claim for relief not specified in this part.

A claim for relief under this chapter survives the death of a person who might have obtained relief as a plaintiff or defendant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.